Illinois, session 104th, SB1217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Section 4.5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/4.5)7    Sec. 4.5. Procedures to implement the rights of crime 8victims. To afford crime victims their rights, law 9enforcement, prosecutors, judges, and corrections will provide 10information, as appropriate, of the following procedures:11    (a) At the request of the crime victim, law enforcement 12authorities investigating the case shall provide notice of the 13status of the investigation, except where the State's Attorney 14determines that disclosure of such information would 15unreasonably interfere with the investigation, until such time 16as the alleged assailant is apprehended or the investigation 17is closed.18    (a-5) When law enforcement authorities reopen a closed 19case to resume investigating, they shall provide notice of the 20reopening of the case, except where the State's Attorney 21determines that disclosure of such information would 22unreasonably interfere with the investigation. 23    (b) The office of the State's Attorney:  SB1217- 2 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        (1) shall provide notice of the filing of an 2    information, the return of an indictment, or the filing of 3    a petition to adjudicate a minor as a delinquent for a 4    violent crime;5        (2) shall provide timely notice of the date, time, and 6    place of court proceedings; of any change in the date, 7    time, and place of court proceedings; and of any 8    cancellation of court proceedings. Notice shall be 9    provided in sufficient time, wherever possible, for the 10    victim to make arrangements to attend or to prevent an 11    unnecessary appearance at court proceedings;12        (3) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 13    information of social services and financial assistance 14    available for victims of crime, including information of 15    how to apply for these services and assistance;16        (3.5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 17    information about available victim services, including 18    referrals to programs, counselors, and agencies that 19    assist a victim to deal with trauma, loss, and grief; 20        (4) shall assist in having any stolen or other 21    personal property held by law enforcement authorities for 22    evidentiary or other purposes returned as expeditiously as 23    possible, pursuant to the procedures set out in Section 24    115-9 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;25        (5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 26    appropriate employer intercession services to ensure that   SB1217- 3 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    employers of victims will cooperate with the criminal 2    justice system in order to minimize an employee's loss of 3    pay and other benefits resulting from court appearances;4        (6) shall provide, whenever possible, a secure waiting 5    area during court proceedings that does not require 6    victims to be in close proximity to defendants or 7    juveniles accused of a violent crime, and their families 8    and friends;9        (7) shall provide notice to the crime victim of the 10    right to have a translator present at all court 11    proceedings and, in compliance with the federal Americans 12    with Disabilities Act of 1990, the right to communications 13    access through a sign language interpreter or by other 14    means;15        (8) (blank);16        (8.5) shall inform the victim of the right to be 17    present at all court proceedings, unless the victim is to 18    testify and the court determines that the victim's 19    testimony would be materially affected if the victim hears 20    other testimony at trial; 21        (9) shall inform the victim of the right to have 22    present at all court proceedings, subject to the rules of 23    evidence and confidentiality, an advocate and other 24    support person of the victim's choice; 25        (9.3) shall inform the victim of the right to retain 26    an attorney, at the victim's own expense, who, upon   SB1217- 4 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    written notice filed with the clerk of the court and 2    State's Attorney, is to receive copies of all notices, 3    motions, and court orders filed thereafter in the case, in 4    the same manner as if the victim were a named party in the 5    case;6        (9.5) shall inform the victim of (A) the victim's 7    right under Section 6 of this Act to make a statement at 8    the sentencing hearing; (B) the right of the victim's 9    spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other immediate 10    family and household members under Section 6 of this Act 11    to present a statement at sentencing; and (C) if a 12    presentence report is to be prepared, the right of the 13    victim's spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other 14    immediate family and household members to submit 15    information to the preparer of the presentence report 16    about the effect the offense has had on the victim and the 17    person;18        (10) at the sentencing shall make a good faith attempt 19    to explain the minimum amount of time during which the 20    defendant may actually be physically imprisoned. The 21    Office of the State's Attorney shall further notify the 22    crime victim of the right to request from the Prisoner 23    Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice information 24    concerning the release of the defendant;25        (11) shall request restitution at sentencing and as 26    part of a plea agreement if the victim requests   SB1217- 5 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    restitution;2        (12) shall, upon the court entering a verdict of not 3    guilty by reason of insanity, inform the victim of the 4    notification services available from the Department of 5    Human Services, including the statewide telephone number, 6    under subparagraph (d)(2) of this Section; 7        (13) shall provide notice within a reasonable time 8    after receipt of notice from the custodian, of the release 9    of the defendant on pretrial release or personal 10    recognizance or the release from detention of a minor who 11    has been detained;12        (14) shall explain in nontechnical language the 13    details of any plea or verdict of a defendant, or any 14    adjudication of a juvenile as a delinquent;15        (15) shall make all reasonable efforts to consult with 16    the crime victim before the Office of the State's Attorney 17    makes an offer of a plea bargain to the defendant or enters 18    into negotiations with the defendant concerning a possible 19    plea agreement, and shall consider the written statement, 20    if prepared prior to entering into a plea agreement. The 21    right to consult with the prosecutor does not include the 22    right to veto a plea agreement or to insist the case go to 23    trial. If the State's Attorney has not consulted with the 24    victim prior to making an offer or entering into plea 25    negotiations with the defendant, the Office of the State's 26    Attorney shall notify the victim of the offer or the   SB1217- 6 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    negotiations within 2 business days and confer with the 2    victim;3        (16) shall provide notice of the ultimate disposition 4    of the cases arising from an indictment or an information, 5    or a petition to have a juvenile adjudicated as a 6    delinquent for a violent crime;7        (17) shall provide notice of any appeal taken by the 8    defendant and information on how to contact the 9    appropriate agency handling the appeal, and how to request 10    notice of any hearing, oral argument, or decision of an 11    appellate court;12        (18) shall provide timely notice of any request for 13    post-conviction review filed by the defendant under 14    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, and 15    of the date, time and place of any hearing concerning the 16    petition. Whenever possible, notice of the hearing shall 17    be given within 48 hours of the court's scheduling of the 18    hearing;19        (19) shall forward a copy of any statement presented 20    under Section 6 to the Prisoner Review Board or Department 21    of Juvenile Justice to be considered in making a 22    determination under Section 3-2.5-85 or subsection (b) of 23    Section 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of Corrections;24        (20) shall, within a reasonable time, offer to meet 25    with the crime victim regarding the decision of the 26    State's Attorney not to charge an offense, and shall meet   SB1217- 7 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    with the victim, if the victim agrees. The victim has a 2    right to have an attorney, advocate, and other support 3    person of the victim's choice attend this meeting with the 4    victim; and5        (21) shall give the crime victim timely notice of any 6    decision not to pursue charges and consider the safety of 7    the victim when deciding how to give such notice. 8    (c) The court shall ensure that the rights of the victim 9are afforded. 10    (c-5) The following procedures shall be followed to afford 11victims the rights guaranteed by Article I, Section 8.1 of the 12Illinois Constitution:13        (1) Written notice. A victim may complete a written 14    notice of intent to assert rights on a form prepared by the 15    Office of the Attorney General and provided to the victim 16    by the State's Attorney. The victim may at any time 17    provide a revised written notice to the State's Attorney. 18    The State's Attorney shall file the written notice with 19    the court. At the beginning of any court proceeding in 20    which the right of a victim may be at issue, the court and 21    prosecutor shall review the written notice to determine 22    whether the victim has asserted the right that may be at 23    issue.24        (2) Victim's retained attorney. A victim's attorney 25    shall file an entry of appearance limited to assertion of 26    the victim's rights. Upon the filing of the entry of   SB1217- 8 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    appearance and service on the State's Attorney and the 2    defendant, the attorney is to receive copies of all 3    notices, motions and court orders filed thereafter in the 4    case.5        (3) Standing. The victim has standing to assert the 6    rights enumerated in subsection (a) of Article I, Section 7    8.1 of the Illinois Constitution and the statutory rights 8    under Section 4 of this Act in any court exercising 9    jurisdiction over the criminal case. The prosecuting 10    attorney, a victim, or the victim's retained attorney may 11    assert the victim's rights. The defendant in the criminal 12    case has no standing to assert a right of the victim in any 13    court proceeding, including on appeal.14        (4) Assertion of and enforcement of rights.15            (A) The prosecuting attorney shall assert a 16        victim's right or request enforcement of a right by 17        filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 18        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 19        case outside the presence of the jury. The prosecuting 20        attorney shall consult with the victim and the 21        victim's attorney regarding the assertion or 22        enforcement of a right. If the prosecuting attorney 23        decides not to assert or enforce a victim's right, the 24        prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim or the 25        victim's attorney in sufficient time to allow the 26        victim or the victim's attorney to assert the right or   SB1217- 9 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        to seek enforcement of a right.2            (B) If the prosecuting attorney elects not to 3        assert a victim's right or to seek enforcement of a 4        right, the victim or the victim's attorney may assert 5        the victim's right or request enforcement of a right 6        by filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 7        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 8        case outside the presence of the jury.9            (C) If the prosecuting attorney asserts a victim's 10        right or seeks enforcement of a right, unless the 11        prosecuting attorney objects or the trial court does 12        not allow it, the victim or the victim's attorney may 13        be heard regarding the prosecuting attorney's motion 14        or may file a simultaneous motion to assert or request 15        enforcement of the victim's right. If the victim or 16        the victim's attorney was not allowed to be heard at 17        the hearing regarding the prosecuting attorney's 18        motion, and the court denies the prosecuting 19        attorney's assertion of the right or denies the 20        request for enforcement of a right, the victim or 21        victim's attorney may file a motion to assert the 22        victim's right or to request enforcement of the right 23        within 10 days of the court's ruling. The motion need 24        not demonstrate the grounds for a motion for 25        reconsideration. The court shall rule on the merits of 26        the motion.  SB1217- 10 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1            (D) The court shall take up and decide any motion 2        or request asserting or seeking enforcement of a 3        victim's right without delay, unless a specific time 4        period is specified by law or court rule. The reasons 5        for any decision denying the motion or request shall 6        be clearly stated on the record.7            (E) No later than January 1, 2023, the Office of 8        the Attorney General shall: 9                (i) designate an administrative authority 10            within the Office of the Attorney General to 11            receive and investigate complaints relating to the 12            provision or violation of the rights of a crime 13            victim as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 14            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act;15                (ii) create and administer a course of 16            training for employees and offices of the State of 17            Illinois that fail to comply with provisions of 18            Illinois law pertaining to the treatment of crime 19            victims as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 20            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act as 21            required by the court under Section 5 of this Act; 22            and23                (iii) have the authority to make 24            recommendations to employees and offices of the 25            State of Illinois to respond more effectively to 26            the needs of crime victims, including regarding   SB1217- 11 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1            the violation of the rights of a crime victim.2            (F) Crime victims' rights may also be asserted by 3        filing a complaint for mandamus, injunctive, or 4        declaratory relief in the jurisdiction in which the 5        victim's right is being violated or where the crime is 6        being prosecuted. For complaints or motions filed by 7        or on behalf of the victim, the clerk of court shall 8        waive filing fees that would otherwise be owed by the 9        victim for any court filing with the purpose of 10        enforcing crime victims' rights. If the court denies 11        the relief sought by the victim, the reasons for the 12        denial shall be clearly stated on the record in the 13        transcript of the proceedings, in a written opinion, 14        or in the docket entry, and the victim may appeal the 15        circuit court's decision to the appellate court. The 16        court shall issue prompt rulings regarding victims' 17        rights. Proceedings seeking to enforce victims' rights 18        shall not be stayed or subject to unreasonable delay 19        via continuances. 20        (5) Violation of rights and remedies. 21            (A) If the court determines that a victim's right 22        has been violated, the court shall determine the 23        appropriate remedy for the violation of the victim's 24        right by hearing from the victim and the parties, 25        considering all factors relevant to the issue, and 26        then awarding appropriate relief to the victim.  SB1217- 12 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1            (A-5) Consideration of an issue of a substantive 2        nature or an issue that implicates the constitutional 3        or statutory right of a victim at a court proceeding 4        labeled as a status hearing shall constitute a per se 5        violation of a victim's right. 6            (B) The appropriate remedy shall include only 7        actions necessary to provide the victim the right to 8        which the victim was entitled. Remedies may include, 9        but are not limited to: injunctive relief requiring 10        the victim's right to be afforded; declaratory 11        judgment recognizing or clarifying the victim's 12        rights; a writ of mandamus; and may include reopening 13        previously held proceedings; however, in no event 14        shall the court vacate a conviction. Any remedy shall 15        be tailored to provide the victim an appropriate 16        remedy without violating any constitutional right of 17        the defendant. In no event shall the appropriate 18        remedy to the victim be a new trial or damages.19        The court shall impose a mandatory training course 20    provided by the Attorney General for the employee under 21    item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4), which must 22    be successfully completed within 6 months of the entry of 23    the court order.24        This paragraph (5) takes effect January 2, 2023.25        (6) Right to be heard. Whenever a victim has the right 26    to be heard, the court shall allow the victim to exercise   SB1217- 13 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    the right in any reasonable manner the victim chooses.2        (7) Right to attend trial. A party must file a written 3    motion to exclude a victim from trial at least 60 days 4    prior to the date set for trial. The motion must state with 5    specificity the reason exclusion is necessary to protect a 6    constitutional right of the party, and must contain an 7    offer of proof. The court shall rule on the motion within 8    30 days. If the motion is granted, the court shall set 9    forth on the record the facts that support its finding 10    that the victim's testimony will be materially affected if 11    the victim hears other testimony at trial.12        (8) Right to have advocate and support person present 13    at court proceedings.14            (A) A party who intends to call an advocate as a 15        witness at trial must seek permission of the court 16        before the subpoena is issued. The party must file a 17        written motion at least 90 days before trial that sets 18        forth specifically the issues on which the advocate's 19        testimony is sought and an offer of proof regarding 20        (i) the content of the anticipated testimony of the 21        advocate; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 22        materiality of the anticipated testimony. The court 23        shall consider the motion and make findings within 30 24        days of the filing of the motion. If the court finds by 25        a preponderance of the evidence that: (i) the 26        anticipated testimony is not protected by an absolute   SB1217- 14 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        privilege; and (ii) the anticipated testimony contains 2        relevant, admissible, and material evidence that is 3        not available through other witnesses or evidence, the 4        court shall issue a subpoena requiring the advocate to 5        appear to testify at an in camera hearing. The 6        prosecuting attorney and the victim shall have 15 days 7        to seek appellate review before the advocate is 8        required to testify at an ex parte in camera 9        proceeding. 10            The prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the 11        advocate's attorney shall be allowed to be present at 12        the ex parte in camera proceeding. If, after 13        conducting the ex parte in camera hearing, the court 14        determines that due process requires any testimony 15        regarding confidential or privileged information or 16        communications, the court shall provide to the 17        prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the advocate's 18        attorney a written memorandum on the substance of the 19        advocate's testimony. The prosecuting attorney, the 20        victim, and the advocate's attorney shall have 15 days 21        to seek appellate review before a subpoena may be 22        issued for the advocate to testify at trial. The 23        presence of the prosecuting attorney at the ex parte 24        in camera proceeding does not make the substance of 25        the advocate's testimony that the court has ruled 26        inadmissible subject to discovery.  SB1217- 15 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1            (B) If a victim has asserted the right to have a 2        support person present at the court proceedings, the 3        victim shall provide the name of the person the victim 4        has chosen to be the victim's support person to the 5        prosecuting attorney, within 60 days of trial. The 6        prosecuting attorney shall provide the name to the 7        defendant. If the defendant intends to call the 8        support person as a witness at trial, the defendant 9        must seek permission of the court before a subpoena is 10        issued. The defendant must file a written motion at 11        least 45 days prior to trial that sets forth 12        specifically the issues on which the support person 13        will testify and an offer of proof regarding: (i) the 14        content of the anticipated testimony of the support 15        person; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 16        materiality of the anticipated testimony.17            If the prosecuting attorney intends to call the 18        support person as a witness during the State's 19        case-in-chief, the prosecuting attorney shall inform 20        the court of this intent in the response to the 21        defendant's written motion. The victim may choose a 22        different person to be the victim's support person. 23        The court may allow the defendant to inquire about 24        matters outside the scope of the direct examination 25        during cross-examination. If the court allows the 26        defendant to do so, the support person shall be   SB1217- 16 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        allowed to remain in the courtroom after the support 2        person has testified. A defendant who fails to 3        question the support person about matters outside the 4        scope of direct examination during the State's 5        case-in-chief waives the right to challenge the 6        presence of the support person on appeal. The court 7        shall allow the support person to testify if called as 8        a witness in the defendant's case-in-chief or the 9        State's rebuttal.10            If the court does not allow the defendant to 11        inquire about matters outside the scope of the direct 12        examination, the support person shall be allowed to 13        remain in the courtroom after the support person has 14        been called by the defendant or the defendant has 15        rested. The court shall allow the support person to 16        testify in the State's rebuttal.17            If the prosecuting attorney does not intend to 18        call the support person in the State's case-in-chief, 19        the court shall verify with the support person whether 20        the support person, if called as a witness, would 21        testify as set forth in the offer of proof. If the 22        court finds that the support person would testify as 23        set forth in the offer of proof, the court shall rule 24        on the relevance, materiality, and admissibility of 25        the anticipated testimony. If the court rules the 26        anticipated testimony is admissible, the court shall   SB1217- 17 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        issue the subpoena. The support person may remain in 2        the courtroom after the support person testifies and 3        shall be allowed to testify in rebuttal.4            If the court excludes the victim's support person 5        during the State's case-in-chief, the victim shall be 6        allowed to choose another support person to be present 7        in court. 8            If the victim fails to designate a support person 9        within 60 days of trial and the defendant has 10        subpoenaed the support person to testify at trial, the 11        court may exclude the support person from the trial 12        until the support person testifies. If the court 13        excludes the support person the victim may choose 14        another person as a support person. 15        (9) Right to notice and hearing before disclosure of 16    confidential or privileged information or records.17            (A) A defendant who seeks to subpoena testimony or 18        records of or concerning the victim that are 19        confidential or privileged by law must seek permission 20        of the court before the subpoena is issued. The 21        defendant must file a written motion and an offer of 22        proof regarding the relevance, admissibility and 23        materiality of the testimony or records. If the court 24        finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:25                (i) the testimony or records are not protected 26            by an absolute privilege and  SB1217- 18 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1                (ii) the testimony or records contain 2            relevant, admissible, and material evidence that 3            is not available through other witnesses or 4            evidence, the court shall issue a subpoena 5            requiring the witness to appear in camera or a 6            sealed copy of the records be delivered to the 7            court to be reviewed in camera. If, after 8            conducting an in camera review of the witness 9            statement or records, the court determines that 10            due process requires disclosure of any potential 11            testimony or any portion of the records, the court 12            shall provide copies of the records that it 13            intends to disclose to the prosecuting attorney 14            and the victim. The prosecuting attorney and the 15            victim shall have 30 days to seek appellate review 16            before the records are disclosed to the defendant, 17            used in any court proceeding, or disclosed to 18            anyone or in any way that would subject the 19            testimony or records to public review. The 20            disclosure of copies of any portion of the 21            testimony or records to the prosecuting attorney 22            under this Section does not make the records 23            subject to discovery or required to be provided to 24            the defendant.25            (B) A prosecuting attorney who seeks to subpoena 26        information or records concerning the victim that are   SB1217- 19 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        confidential or privileged by law must first request 2        the written consent of the crime victim. If the victim 3        does not provide such written consent, including where 4        necessary the appropriate signed document required for 5        waiving privilege, the prosecuting attorney must serve 6        the subpoena at least 21 days prior to the date a 7        response or appearance is required to allow the 8        subject of the subpoena time to file a motion to quash 9        or request a hearing. The prosecuting attorney must 10        also send a written notice to the victim at least 21 11        days prior to the response date to allow the victim to 12        file a motion or request a hearing. The notice to the 13        victim shall inform the victim (i) that a subpoena has 14        been issued for confidential information or records 15        concerning the victim, (ii) that the victim has the 16        right to request a hearing prior to the response date 17        of the subpoena, and (iii) how to request the hearing. 18        The notice to the victim shall also include a copy of 19        the subpoena. If requested, a hearing regarding the 20        subpoena shall occur before information or records are 21        provided to the prosecuting attorney. 22        (10) Right to notice of court proceedings. If the 23    victim is not present at a court proceeding in which a 24    right of the victim is at issue, the court shall ask the 25    prosecuting attorney whether the victim was notified of 26    the time, place, and purpose of the court proceeding and   SB1217- 20 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    that the victim had a right to be heard at the court 2    proceeding. If the court determines that timely notice was 3    not given or that the victim was not adequately informed 4    of the nature of the court proceeding, the court shall not 5    rule on any substantive issues, accept a plea, or impose a 6    sentence and shall continue the hearing for the time 7    necessary to notify the victim of the time, place and 8    nature of the court proceeding. The time between court 9    proceedings shall not be attributable to the State under 10    Section 103-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.11        (11) Right to timely disposition of the case. A victim 12    has the right to timely disposition of the case so as to 13    minimize the stress, cost, and inconvenience resulting 14    from the victim's involvement in the case. Before ruling 15    on a motion to continue trial or other court proceeding, 16    the court shall inquire into the circumstances for the 17    request for the delay and, if the victim has provided 18    written notice of the assertion of the right to a timely 19    disposition, and whether the victim objects to the delay. 20    If the victim objects, the prosecutor shall inform the 21    court of the victim's objections. If the prosecutor has 22    not conferred with the victim about the continuance, the 23    prosecutor shall inform the court of the attempts to 24    confer. If the court finds the attempts of the prosecutor 25    to confer with the victim were inadequate to protect the 26    victim's right to be heard, the court shall give the   SB1217- 21 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    prosecutor at least 3 but not more than 5 business days to 2    confer with the victim. In ruling on a motion to continue, 3    the court shall consider the reasons for the requested 4    continuance, the number and length of continuances that 5    have been granted, the victim's objections and procedures 6    to avoid further delays. If a continuance is granted over 7    the victim's objection, the court shall specify on the 8    record the reasons for the continuance and the procedures 9    that have been or will be taken to avoid further delays.10        (12) Right to Restitution.11            (A) If the victim has asserted the right to 12        restitution and the amount of restitution is known at 13        the time of sentencing, the court shall enter the 14        judgment of restitution at the time of sentencing. 15            (B) If the victim has asserted the right to 16        restitution and the amount of restitution is not known 17        at the time of sentencing, the prosecutor shall, 18        within 5 days after sentencing, notify the victim what 19        information and documentation related to restitution 20        is needed and that the information and documentation 21        must be provided to the prosecutor within 45 days 22        after sentencing. Failure to timely provide 23        information and documentation related to restitution 24        shall be deemed a waiver of the right to restitution. 25        The prosecutor shall file and serve within 60 days 26        after sentencing a proposed judgment for restitution   SB1217- 22 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        and a notice that includes information concerning the 2        identity of any victims or other persons seeking 3        restitution, whether any victim or other person 4        expressly declines restitution, the nature and amount 5        of any damages together with any supporting 6        documentation, a restitution amount recommendation, 7        and the names of any co-defendants and their case 8        numbers. Within 30 days after receipt of the proposed 9        judgment for restitution, the defendant shall file any 10        objection to the proposed judgment, a statement of 11        grounds for the objection, and a financial statement. 12        If the defendant does not file an objection, the court 13        may enter the judgment for restitution without further 14        proceedings. If the defendant files an objection and 15        either party requests a hearing, the court shall 16        schedule a hearing. 17        (13) Access to presentence reports.18            (A) The victim may request a copy of the 19        presentence report prepared under the Unified Code of 20        Corrections from the State's Attorney. The State's 21        Attorney shall redact the following information before 22        providing a copy of the report:23                (i) the defendant's mental history and 24            condition;25                (ii) any evaluation prepared under subsection 26            (b) or (b-5) of Section 5-3-2; and  SB1217- 23 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1                (iii) the name, address, phone number, and 2            other personal information about any other victim.3            (B) The State's Attorney or the defendant may 4        request the court redact other information in the 5        report that may endanger the safety of any person.6            (C) The State's Attorney may orally disclose to 7        the victim any of the information that has been 8        redacted if there is a reasonable likelihood that the 9        information will be stated in court at the sentencing.10            (D) The State's Attorney must advise the victim 11        that the victim must maintain the confidentiality of 12        the report and other information. Any dissemination of 13        the report or information that was not stated at a 14        court proceeding constitutes indirect criminal 15        contempt of court. 16        (14) Appellate relief. If the trial court denies the 17    relief requested, the victim, the victim's attorney, or 18    the prosecuting attorney may file an appeal within 30 days 19    of the trial court's ruling. The trial or appellate court 20    may stay the court proceedings if the court finds that a 21    stay would not violate a constitutional right of the 22    defendant. If the appellate court denies the relief 23    sought, the reasons for the denial shall be clearly stated 24    in a written opinion. In any appeal in a criminal case, the 25    State may assert as error the court's denial of any crime 26    victim's right in the proceeding to which the appeal   SB1217- 24 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    relates.2        (15) Limitation on appellate relief. In no case shall 3    an appellate court provide a new trial to remedy the 4    violation of a victim's right. 5        (16) The right to be reasonably protected from the 6    accused throughout the criminal justice process and the 7    right to have the safety of the victim and the victim's 8    family considered in determining whether to release the 9    defendant, and setting conditions of release after arrest 10    and conviction. A victim of domestic violence, a sexual 11    offense, or stalking may request the entry of a protective 12    order under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure 13    of 1963. 14    (d) Procedures after the imposition of sentence.15        (1) The Prisoner Review Board shall inform a victim or 16    any other concerned citizen, upon written request, of the 17    prisoner's release on parole, mandatory supervised 18    release, electronic detention, work release, international 19    transfer or exchange, or by the custodian, other than the 20    Department of Juvenile Justice, of the discharge of any 21    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a crime 22    from State custody and by the sheriff of the appropriate 23    county of any such person's final discharge from county 24    custody. The Prisoner Review Board, upon written request, 25    shall provide to a victim or any other concerned citizen a 26    recent photograph of any person convicted of a felony,   SB1217- 25 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    upon his or her release from custody. The Prisoner Review 2    Board, upon written request, shall inform a victim or any 3    other concerned citizen when feasible at least 7 days 4    prior to the prisoner's release on furlough of the times 5    and dates of such furlough. Upon written request by the 6    victim or any other concerned citizen, the State's 7    Attorney shall notify the person once of the times and 8    dates of release of a prisoner sentenced to periodic 9    imprisonment. Notification shall be based on the most 10    recent information as to the victim's or other concerned 11    citizen's residence or other location available to the 12    notifying authority. 13        (1.5) The Prisoner Review Board shall immediately 14    inform a victim of the early release of the prisoner from 15    State custody or of the prisoner's pardon, commutation, 16    furlough, or granting of sentence credit, if the victim 17    has previously requested notification of that information. 18    The notification shall be based upon the most recent 19    information as to the victim's residence or other location 20    available to the Board. When no such information is 21    available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts to 22    obtain the information and make the notification. This 23    notification requirement is in addition to any 24    notification requirements pursuant to any other statewide 25    victim notification systems. The Board must document 26    notification efforts if that victim alleges lack of   SB1217- 26 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    notification under this paragraph (1.5). 2        (2) When the defendant has been committed to the 3    Department of Human Services pursuant to Section 5-2-4 of 4    the Unified Code of Corrections or transferred to the 5    Department of Human Services under Section 3-8-5 and has 6    not been returned to the Department of Corrections under 7    Section 3-8-6 or any other provision of the Unified Code 8    of Corrections, the victim may request to be notified by 9    the releasing authority of the approval by the court of an 10    on-grounds pass, a supervised off-grounds pass, an 11    unsupervised off-grounds pass, or conditional release; the 12    release on an off-grounds pass; the return from an 13    off-grounds pass; transfer to another facility; 14    conditional release; escape; death; or final discharge 15    from State custody. The Department of Human Services shall 16    establish and maintain a statewide telephone number to be 17    used by victims to make notification requests under these 18    provisions and shall publicize this telephone number on 19    its website and to the State's Attorney of each county.20        (2.5) When the defendant has been found guilty but 21    mentally ill pursuant to Section 5-2-6 of the Unified Code 22    of Corrections and is granted early release, pardon, 23    commutation, or furlough, the Prisoner Review Board 24    immediately shall notify the victim, if the victim has 25    previously requested notification of that information. The 26    notification shall be based upon the most recent   SB1217- 27 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    information as to the victim's residence or other location 2    available to the Board. When no such information is 3    available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts to 4    obtain the information and make the notification. This 5    notification requirement is in addition to any 6    notification requirements pursuant to any other statewide 7    victim notification systems. The Board must document 8    notification efforts if the victim alleges lack of 9    notification under this paragraph (2.5). 10        (3) In the event of an escape from State custody, the 11    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 12    Justice immediately shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 13    of the escape and the Prisoner Review Board shall notify 14    the victim. The notification shall be based upon the most 15    recent information as to the victim's residence or other 16    location available to the Board. When no such information 17    is available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts 18    to obtain the information and make the notification. When 19    the escapee is apprehended, the Department of Corrections 20    or the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately shall 21    notify the Prisoner Review Board and the Board shall 22    notify the victim. This notification requirement is in 23    addition to any notification requirements pursuant to any 24    other statewide victim notification systems. The Board 25    must document notification efforts if that victim alleges 26    lack of notification under this paragraph (3).   SB1217- 28 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1        (4) The victim of the crime for which the prisoner has 2    been sentenced has the right to register with the Prisoner 3    Review Board's victim registry. Victims registered with 4    the Board shall receive reasonable written notice not less 5    than 30 days prior to the parole hearing or target 6    aftercare release date. The victim has the right to submit 7    a victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner 8    Review Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice in 9    writing, on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or 10    in the form of a recording prior to the parole hearing or 11    target aftercare release date, or in person at the parole 12    hearing or aftercare release protest hearing, or by 13    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 14    of this Section. The victim shall be notified within 7 15    days after the prisoner has been granted parole or 16    aftercare release and shall be informed of the right to 17    inspect the registry of parole decisions, established 18    under subsection (g) of Section 3-3-5 of the Unified Code 19    of Corrections. The provisions of this paragraph (4) are 20    subject to the Open Parole Hearings Act. Victim statements 21    provided to the Board shall be confidential and 22    privileged, including any statements received prior to 23    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 24    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement 25    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public.26        (4-1) The crime victim has the right to submit a   SB1217- 29 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner Review 2    Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice prior to or at 3    a hearing to determine the conditions of mandatory 4    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 5    sentence or at a hearing on revocation of mandatory 6    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 7    sentence. A victim statement may be submitted in writing, 8    on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or in the 9    form of a recording, or orally at a hearing, or by calling 10    the toll-free number established in subsection (f) of this 11    Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 12    confidential and privileged, including any statements 13    received prior to January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 14    Public Act 101-288), except if the statement was an oral 15    statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the 16    public. 17        (4-2) The crime victim has the right to submit a 18    victim statement to the Prisoner Review Board for 19    consideration at an executive clemency hearing as provided 20    in Section 3-3-13 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A 21    victim statement may be submitted in writing, on film, 22    videotape, or other electronic means, or in the form of a 23    recording prior to a hearing, or orally at a hearing, or by 24    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 25    of this Section. Victim statements provided to the Board 26    shall be confidential and privileged, including any   SB1217- 30 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    statements received prior to January 1, 2020 (the 2    effective date of Public Act 101-288), except if the 3    statement was an oral statement made by the victim at a 4    hearing open to the public. 5        (5) If a statement is presented under Section 6, the 6    Prisoner Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice 7    shall inform the victim of any order of discharge pursuant 8    to Section 3-2.5-85 or 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of 9    Corrections.10        (6) At the written or oral request of the victim of the 11    crime for which the prisoner was sentenced or the State's 12    Attorney of the county where the person seeking parole or 13    aftercare release was prosecuted, the Prisoner Review 14    Board or Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the 15    victim and the State's Attorney of the county where the 16    person seeking parole or aftercare release was prosecuted 17    of the death of the prisoner if the prisoner died while on 18    parole or aftercare release or mandatory supervised 19    release.20        (7) When a defendant who has been committed to the 21    Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 22    Justice, or the Department of Human Services is released 23    or discharged and subsequently committed to the Department 24    of Human Services as a sexually violent person and the 25    victim had requested to be notified by the releasing 26    authority of the defendant's discharge, conditional   SB1217- 31 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1    release, death, or escape from State custody, the 2    releasing authority shall provide to the Department of 3    Human Services such information that would allow the 4    Department of Human Services to contact the victim.5        (8) When a defendant has been convicted of a sex 6    offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 7    Registration Act and has been sentenced to the Department 8    of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 9    Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile 10    Justice shall notify the victim of the sex offense of the 11    prisoner's eligibility for release on parole, aftercare 12    release, mandatory supervised release, electronic 13    detention, work release, international transfer or 14    exchange, or by the custodian of the discharge of any 15    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a sex 16    offense from State custody and by the sheriff of the 17    appropriate county of any such person's final discharge 18    from county custody. The notification shall be made to the 19    victim at least 30 days, whenever possible, before release 20    of the sex offender. 21    (e) The officials named in this Section may satisfy some 22or all of their obligations to provide notices and other 23information through participation in a statewide victim and 24witness notification system established by the Attorney 25General under Section 8.5 of this Act.26    (f) The Prisoner Review Board shall establish a toll-free   SB1217- 32 -LRB104 03910 RLC 13934 b1number that may be accessed by the crime victim to present a 2victim statement to the Board in accordance with paragraphs 3(4), (4-1), and (4-2) of subsection (d).4(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 5101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 68-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)